Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,113.02
Generator; failure to fulfill responsibilities; effect.

If a generator of low-level radioactive waste fails to fulfill its financial or regulatory responsibilities under either the Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact or the Low-Level Radioactive Waste Disposal Act, the wastes generated by that generator shall not be received for disposal at the facility until the obligations are fulfilled.

Laws 1989, LB 761, § 15.

Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact, see section 71-3522.